West Virginia, session 2026, HB4657.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. WEST VIRGINIA PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT ACT. §5-10-15a. Retirement credited service through member's use, as option, of accrued annual or sick leave days. (a) Any member accruing annual leave or sick leave days may, after June 27, 1988, elect to use the days at the time of retirement to acquire additional credited service in this retirement system. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the The accrued days shall be applied on the basis of two workdays credit granted for each one day of such accrued annual or sick leave days, with each month of retirement service credit to equal 20 workdays and with any remainder of 10 workdays or more to constitute a full month of additional credit and any remainder of less than 10 workdays to be dropped and not used, notwithstanding any provisions of the code to the contrary, including §5-16-12 of this code. Such This credited service shall be allowed and not deemed considered to controvert the requirement of no more than 12 months credited service in any year's period.(b) For those persons who first become members of the retirement system on or after July 1, 2015, accrued annual or sick days may not be applied to acquire additional credited service